Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.137

Department of licensing, authority to adopt rules—Reporting of violations—Authority to revoke licenses.

The department of licensing shall have the authority to adopt rules for the implementation of this chapter as amended. In addition, the department of licensing shall report any violation of this chapter by a licensed dealer to the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms and explosives within the United States department of justice and shall have the authority, after notice and a hearing, to revoke the license of any licensed dealer found to be in violation of this chapter.

[ 2015 c 1 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 594, approved November 4, 2014).]

NOTES:

Finding—2015 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 594): See note following RCW 9.41.010.